Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 1. Generally
§ 4023.
Possession of firearms in hospital buildings prohibited [Effective July 1, 2022]

A person shall not knowingly possess a firearm while within a hospital building.

A person who violates this section shall be fined not more than $250.00.

This section shall not apply to a firearm possessed by a federal law enforcement officer or a law enforcement officer certified as a law enforcement officer by the Vermont Criminal Justice Training Council pursuant to 20 V.S.A. § 2358, for legitimate law enforcement purposes.

Notice of the provisions of this section shall be posted conspicuously at each public entrance to each hospital.

As used in this section:

“Firearm” has the same meaning as in subsection 4017(d) of this title.

“Hospital” has the same meaning as in 18 V.S.A. § 1902.

HISTORY:

2021 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.